Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Facilities and Services

26A.090.
Definitions for KRS 26A.090 to 26A.115.

As used in KRS

26A.090

to

26A.115

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Operating costs allowance” means compensation equivalent to the annual expenses borne by the unit of government for utilities, janitorial service, rent, insurance, and necessary maintenance, repair, and upkeep of the court facility which do not increase the permanent value or expected life of the court facility, but keeps it in efficient operating condition, and, at the election of the Administrative Office of the Courts, capital costs of interior or mechanical renovations for the benefit of the court.

“Use allowance” means compensation equal to four percent (4%) annually of the total original capital costs and the cost of capitalized renovation of the court facility, except that if indebtedness has been incurred in respect to such capital costs at an interest rate equal to or greater than seven percent (7%), compensation shall be at a rate of eight percent (8%) annually of that portion of the capital costs for which the rate applies. For refinanced projects constructed or renovated prior to July 1, 1994, the use allowance payment shall not change for the term of the original bond issue, unless there is a change in the space occupied. For court facilities renovated or constructed after July 1, 1994, “use allowance” means the court’s proportional share of the annual principal and interest cost in connection with the renovation or construction, but not to exceed eight percent (8%) annually of capital costs, or, if there is no debt, four percent (4%) annually of capital costs. Beginning with court facility construction or renovation projects authorized by the 2000 Regular Session of the General Assembly, “use allowance” means the court’s proportional share of the annual principal and interest costs in connection with the construction or renovation of the facility, not to exceed the authorized annual use allowance.

“Capital costs” means the costs borne by the unit of government, excluding grants, conditioned by the grantor agency specifically for court facility construction or renovation, for acquisition of property and for construction and capitalized renovation including interest accruing during construction or renovation, but no other interest of each court facility. If capital costs are not documented, reasonable estimates provided by qualified appraisers will suffice. After July 14, 2000, capital costs, for the purpose of computing the maximum annual use allowance, shall not exceed the project scope as authorized by the General Assembly in the judicial branch budget or as increased and approved under KRS

26A.164

.

“Capitalized renovation” means all remodeling involving the structural or mechanical systems, except for remodeling that involves substantial demolition of the original structure. Remodeling involving substantial demolition of the original structure shall constitute construction resulting in a new court facility.

“Unit of government” means a county, city, urban-county government, special district, or corporate entity created for the purpose of constructing or holding title to a court facility.

“Court facility” means the land and buildings owned or operated by a unit of government in which space for the court of justice is provided. Judges’ benches, jury and witness boxes, and fixed seating shall be considered as permanent building fixtures.

“Court facilities standards committee” means a committee consisting of the Chief Justice or his designee; one (1) judge each of the Court of Appeals, the Circuit Court, and the District Court appointed by the Supreme Court; the president of the Circuit Clerks’ Association; the chairmen of the House and Senate Judiciary Committees of the General Assembly; the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet; the director of the Administrative Office of the Courts; and a county judge/executive appointed by the Governor. Each appointed member shall serve for a term of four (4) years from the date of his appointment or until he vacates the office in respect to which he was appointed, whichever is earlier.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 336, § 1, effective July 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 294, § 1, effective July 1, 1994; 1998, ch. 28, § 1, effective March 6, 1998; 2000, ch. 496, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Pt. I, A, 1, b, (5) at 981.

26A.100.
Places of holding court — Facilities to be furnished by local governmental units — Procedure when local public facilities not available.

The Circuit and the District Court shall be held in the county courthouse of each county unless otherwise ordered by the Supreme Court in which case it may be held at any other location made available by the county and owned, leased, or controlled by the county. Circuit or District Court may also be held in such other locations in the county as may be convenient and approved by the Supreme Court.

Every county or urban-county government shall provide such reasonably available space which would not disrupt the operation of county government as necessary in the county courthouse, or in other county facilities as permitted in subsection (1) of this section, for:

A courtroom or courtrooms for the Circuit and the District Court;

Chambers for the Circuit Judge and District Judge or Judges;

Office space for the Circuit and District Court staffs;

Office and storage space for the circuit clerk’s operations;

Jury facilities for the Circuit and the District Court;

Office space for other officers of the Court of Justice including pretrial release officers, court reporters, court administrators, judges’ secretaries, friends of the court and commissioners; and

Such other facilities necessary for the operation of the Circuit and the District Court as may be agreed upon by the county or urban-county government and the Administrative Office of the Courts.

If all necessary facilities for the holding of Circuit or District Court, for the clerk’s operations, or for the operation of the court or its ancillary functions, are not available in county facilities, every city shall, upon request of the Administrative Office of the Courts, provide such reasonably available space which would not disrupt the operation of city government as necessary in the city’s facilities for the operations of Circuit or District Court, or both. The city shall be responsible for providing space for the operations listed in subsection (2) of this section.

If all necessary facilities for the holding of Circuit or District Court, for the clerk’s operations, or for the operation of the court or its ancillary functions, are not available in county or city facilities, every agency of state government, special district, and independent agency of local government, other than a city, may, upon the request of the Administrative Office of the Courts, provide such space as necessary in facilities owned, leased, or controlled by such organization for the operations of Circuit or District Court, or both. The agency may provide space for the operations listed in subsection (2) of this section.

If all necessary facilities for the holding of Circuit or District Court, for the clerk’s operations, or for the operation of the court or its ancillary functions, are not available in public facilities, private facilities may be rented, leased, purchased, or otherwise acquired, by the Administrative Office of the Courts pursuant to permission granted by the Chief Justice for such acquisition and in compliance with the provisions of KRS Chapters 45 and 56.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 7, effective November 1, 1977; 1978, ch. 336, § 2, effective July 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 3, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section does not mandate the placing of the Circuit and District Courts on the same floor or placing them in the same courtroom.

OAG 77-177

.

The legislature intended to weigh the sheer urgency of housing the new court system against the housing of necessary and vital county governmental operations in county courthouses and other county buildings and the housing of the new court system was to be given a high priority, subject to the principle that necessary county governmental operations would not be disrupted.

OAG 78-116

.

The provision that the county shall provide such “reasonably available space” to the court system indicates that the initial determination of whether reasonably available space exists in a particular county is addressed, not to the judicial courts, but to the fiscal courts, and the fiscal court’s decision in this matter is final, except where the courts determine in an appropriate suit that the fiscal court acted arbitrarily in determining that the space was not reasonably available for the courts.

OAG 78-116

.

If a county cannot provide satisfactory office space for the Circuit Judge, and no public facilities are available as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, then under subsection (5) of this section, private facilities may be leased for the judge by the Finance Department.

OAG 82-14

.

If a fiscal court is leasing courthouse space to the Circuit Judge, the fiscal court could not terminate this lease and use this office space for other county offices.

OAG 82-14

.

Where a Circuit Court is being held in a county courthouse, the fiscal court is, as a practical matter, required by subsection (2) of this section to also provide a Circuit Judge’s chambers or office in the courthouse.

OAG 82-14

.

Assuming that the Supreme Court of Kentucky has not ordered nor approved otherwise, the county government is mandated to furnish reasonably available space, as necessary, in the county courthouse, for the court system, as described in subsection (2) of this section, which would not disrupt the operation of county government.

OAG 84-159

.

It is clear from reading subsection (1) of this section that the county courthouse is the prime sought location of the local courts and the adjunctive operations, and the county, through the fiscal court, must provide such location, where the needed space is reasonably available and would not disrupt the operation of county government.

OAG 84-159

.

The provision that the county shall provide such reasonably available space to the court system indicates that the initial determination of whether reasonably available space exists in a particular county is addressed to the fiscal court; its decision is final, except where the courts determine, in appropriate litigation, that the fiscal court acted arbitrarily.

OAG 84-159

.

Considering that the adequate housing of the court and the jail systems are to be given a high priority, under KRS

67.080

,

67.083

and this section, the fiscal court of any county has the authority to allocate space in the county courthouse or its county buildings for the court and jail systems; its exercise of such authority can only be reversed by the courts, in a proper law suit, where the courts deem that the fiscal court has acted arbitrarily in its allocation decisions.

OAG 84-263

.

The first or immediate level of responsibility for furnishing space to the court system rests with the county government, and the initial determination of whether “reasonably available space” exists in a particular county facility is addressed to the appropriate fiscal court; therefore, unless the Kentucky Supreme Court has ordered otherwise, the county government is required to furnish reasonably available space in the county courthouse facilities.

OAG 96-18

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Palmore, Kentucky’s New Court System a Model for Southeastern States, Vol. 43, No. 1, January, 1979, Ky. Bench & Bar 17.

26A.105.
Long-term lease agreements. [Repealed.]

26A.107.
Periodic review of court facilities — Use allowance payment on construction contracted for after July 1, 1978.

The Court Facilities Standards Committee shall provide for periodic review of each court facility and may make recommendations for improvements.

No use allowance shall be paid respecting any capital costs contracted for any court facility after July 1, 1978, unless the construction or renovation receives prior concurrence by the Court Facilities Standards Committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 336, § 5, effective July 1, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Palmore, Kentucky’s New Court System a Model for Southeastern States, Vol. 43, No. 1, January, 1979, Ky. Bench & Bar 17.

26A.110.
Utilities and janitorial services furnished by counties, urban-county governments, and cities.

Counties, urban-county governments, and cities providing space for court operations pursuant to KRS

26A.100

shall also provide adequate:

Lighting;

Heating;

Electricity;

Other utilities, except telephone service; and

Janitorial services

as an adjunct to the providing of space required by that section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 8, effective November 1, 1977.

26A.115.
Operating costs allowance and use allowance payments.

Each unit of government providing space in a court facility to the Court of Justice under the provisions of KRS

26A.100

shall be paid an operating costs allowance plus a use allowance to be administered by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

The precise amount paid for operating costs allowance and use allowance shall be computed by allocating to the Court of Justice its proportionate share of each category according to the relative portion of the floor space in the facility which is occupied by the Court of Justice. Compensation shall be calculated on an annualized basis, may be in the form of rental per square footage, and shall be paid quarterly. Should the availability of space provided to the Court of Justice be limited by the governmental unit to a part-time basis, the compensation shall be apportioned according to the number of days or partial days per week in which it is made available, one (1) day or partial day per week being considered as one-fifth (0.2) of the time.

If requested by a unit of government, operating costs allowance and use allowance payments due in accordance with subsection (2) of this section shall be due and payable to the unit of government not less than ten (10) days prior to the interest due date for the bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued to finance the capital costs for court facility space provided to the Court of Justice by the requesting unit of government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 336, § 3, effective July 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 449, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 294, § 2, effective July 1, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Palmore, Kentucky’s New Court System a Model for Southeastern States, Vol. 43, No. 1, January, 1979, Ky. Bench & Bar 17.

26A.120.
Purchase of equipment — Extraordinary specialized facilities or services.

As of January 1, 1978, all new equipment purchases for the Court of Justice shall be made by the Court of Justice and paid from state or other available funds.

The Court of Justice may contract with a local unit of government to furnish extraordinary specialized facilities or services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 72, effective January 2, 1978.

26A.130.
Conveyance of court facility to Commonwealth.

A court facility which is entirely dedicated to Court of Justice purposes may be conveyed to the Commonwealth for court purposes with or without consideration. Provided, however, that no such conveyance shall be accepted by the Commonwealth unless the Administrative Office of the Courts has certified its agreement to maintain the facility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 449, § 5, effective July 15, 1982.

26A.140.
Accommodation of special needs of children.

Courts shall implement measures to accommodate the special needs of children which are not unduly burdensome to the rights of the defendant, including, but not limited to:

Trained guardians ad litem or special advocates, if available, shall be appointed for all child victims and shall serve in Circuit and District Courts to offer consistency and support to the child and to represent the child’s interests where needed.

During trials involving child victims or child witnesses, the environment of the courtroom shall be modified to accommodate children through the use of small chairs, frequent breaks, and the use of age appropriate language.

Children expected to testify shall be prepared for the courtroom experience by the Commonwealth’s or county attorney handling the case with the assistance of the guardian ad litem or special advocate.

In appropriate cases, procedures shall be used to shield children from visual contact with alleged perpetrator.

The Supreme Court is encouraged to issue rules for the conduct of criminal and civil trials involving child abuse in which a child victim or child witness may testify at the trial.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 351, § 9, effective July 14, 1992.

26A.150.
Collection and forwarding of crime victim compensation fee. [Repealed.]